Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-413
Forts; federal aid; acceptance.

Full and complete acceptance and assent is made and given by the State of Nebraska to all and every one of the terms and conditions set forth in the Acts of Congress which offer aid to the state for the agencies of the state government, including boards created by section 72-407, by way of grants in aid of construction of public buildings for the preserving, restoring and developing of abandoned federal fort sites.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 4, p. 585;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-414;

R.S.1943, § 72-413.